Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 2.1 Domestic Steel

37-2.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Steel Products Procurement Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 299, § 1.

37-2.1-2.
Purpose.

This chapter shall be deemed to be an exercise of the police powers of the state for the protection of the health, safety, and general welfare of the people of the state.

It is hereby determined by the general assembly of Rhode Island and declared as a matter of legislative findings that:

The United States is one of the leading countries in the production and use of steel and its allied products;

The use of steel products constitutes a major industry of the United States and, as such, provides the jobs and family incomes of millions of people in the United States;

The taxes paid to Rhode Island and the United States by employers and employees engaged in the production and sale of steel products are one of the largest single sources of public revenues in this country;

It has for many years been the policy of the state to aid and support the development and expansion of industry in the United States in order to foster the economic well-being of the state and its people; and

The economy, general welfare, and national security of the United States are inseparably related to the preservation and development of the steel industry in the United States.

The general assembly therefore declares it to be the policy of the state that all public officers and agencies should, at all times, aid and promote the development of the steel industry of the United States in order to stimulate and improve the economic well-being of the state and its people.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 299, § 1.

37-2.1-3.
Purchase of steel and steel products.

Every public agency shall require that every contract document for the construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, improvement, or maintenance of public works contain a provision that if any steel products are to be used or supplied in the performance of the contract only steel products as herein defined shall be used or supplied in the performance of the contract or any subcontracts thereunder.

This section shall not apply in any case where the head of the public agency, in writing, determines that steel products as herein defined are not produced in or readily available in the United States or that the steel products shall not exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the costs of any other steel products obtainable nationally or internationally.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 299, § 1.

37-2.1-4.
Payment.

No public agency shall authorize, provide for, or make any payments to any person under any contract containing the provision required by §

37-2.1-3

unless the public agency is satisfied that the person has fully complied with that provision. Any payments made to any person by any public agency which should not have been made, as a result of this section, shall be recoverable directly from the contractor or subcontractor who did not comply with §

37-2.1-3

by either the public agency or the attorney general upon suit filed in the court of any county.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 299, § 1.

37-2.1-5.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:

“Person” means natural persons as well as corporations, partnerships, business units, and associations;

“Public agency” means any and all other public bodies, authorities, officers, agencies, or instrumentalities, whether exercising a governmental or proprietary function;

The state and its departments, boards, commissions and agencies;

Cities, towns, school districts, and any other governmental unit or district; or

Any and all other public bodies, authorities, officers, agencies, or instrumentalities, whether exercising a governmental or proprietary function;

“Public works” means steel to construct, frame or reinforce any public structure, building, highway, waterway, street, bridge, transit system, airport, or other betterment, work, or improvement, whether of a permanent or temporary nature, and whether for governmental or proprietary use;

“Steel products” means products rolled, formed, shaped, drawn, extruded, forged, cast, fabricated, or otherwise similarly processed, or processed by a combination of two or more of these operations, from steel made in the United States by the open hearth, basic oxygen, electric furnace, Bessemer, or other steel making process; and

“United States” means the United States of America and includes all territory, continental or insular, subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 299, § 1.